Illinois, session 104th, HB3117.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 203 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/203)  (from Ch. 120, par. 2-203)7    Sec. 203. Base income defined. 8    (a) Individuals.9        (1) In general. In the case of an individual, base 10    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's adjusted 11    gross income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph 12    (2).13        (2) Modifications. The adjusted gross income referred 14    to in paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto 15    the sum of the following amounts:16            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 17        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 18        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 19        in the computation of adjusted gross income, except 20        stock dividends of qualified public utilities 21        described in Section 305(e) of the Internal Revenue 22        Code;23            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by   HB3117- 2 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 2        the computation of adjusted gross income for the 3        taxable year;4            (C) An amount equal to the amount received during 5        the taxable year as a recovery or refund of real 6        property taxes paid with respect to the taxpayer's 7        principal residence under the Revenue Act of 1939 and 8        for which a deduction was previously taken under 9        subparagraph (L) of this paragraph (2) prior to July 10        1, 1991, the retrospective application date of Article 11        4 of Public Act 87-17. In the case of multi-unit or 12        multi-use structures and farm dwellings, the taxes on 13        the taxpayer's principal residence shall be that 14        portion of the total taxes for the entire property 15        which is attributable to such principal residence;16            (D) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 17        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 18        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 19        computation of adjusted gross income;20            (D-5) An amount, to the extent not included in 21        adjusted gross income, equal to the amount of money 22        withdrawn by the taxpayer in the taxable year from a 23        medical care savings account and the interest earned 24        on the account in the taxable year of a withdrawal 25        pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 20 of the 26        Medical Care Savings Account Act or subsection (b) of   HB3117- 3 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        Section 20 of the Medical Care Savings Account Act of 2        2000;3            (D-10) For taxable years ending after December 31, 4        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 5        costs that the individual deducted in computing 6        adjusted gross income and for which the individual 7        claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 201;8            (D-15) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 9        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 10        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 11        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 12        the Internal Revenue Code;13            (D-16) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 14        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 15        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 16        addition modification under subparagraph (D-15), then 17        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 18        deductions taken in all taxable years under 19        subparagraph (Z) with respect to that property.20            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 21        the last day of the last tax year for which a 22        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 23        under subparagraph (Z) and for which the taxpayer was 24        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 25        modification under subparagraph (Z), then an amount 26        equal to that subtraction modification.   HB3117- 4 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 2        modification under this subparagraph only once with 3        respect to any one piece of property;4            (D-17) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 5        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 6        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 7        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 9        member of the same unitary business group but for the 10        fact that foreign person's business activity outside 11        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 12        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 13        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 14        who would be a member of the same unitary business 15        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 16        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 17        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 18        required to apportion business income under different 19        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 20        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 21        extent that dividends were included in base income of 22        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 23        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 24        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 25        included in gross income under Sections 951 through 26        964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts included   HB3117- 5 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        in gross income under Section 78 of the Internal 2        Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of the same 3        person to whom the interest was paid, accrued, or 4        incurred.5            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 6                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 7            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 8            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 9            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 10            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 11            with respect to such interest; or12                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 13            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 14            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 15            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 16            following:17                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 18                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 19                to a person that is not a related member, and20                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 21                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 22                person did not have as a principal purpose the 23                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 24                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 25                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 26                terms; or   HB3117- 6 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 2            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 3            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 4            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 5            and terms and the principal purpose for the 6            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 7            or 8                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 9            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 10            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 11            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 12            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 13            to the application or use of an alternative method 14            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 15                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 16            Director from making any other adjustment 17            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 18            for any tax year beginning after the effective 19            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 20            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 21            Department and such regulations provide methods 22            and standards by which the Department will utilize 23            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 24            (D-18) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 25        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 26        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or   HB3117- 7 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 2        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 3        foreign person who would be a member of the same 4        unitary business group but for the fact that the 5        foreign person's business activity outside the United 6        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 7        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 9        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 10        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 11        from being included in the unitary business group 12        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 13        business income under different subsections of Section 14        304. The addition modification required by this 15        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 16        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 17        group for the same taxable year and received by the 18        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 19        business group (including amounts included in gross 20        income under Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal 21        Revenue Code and amounts included in gross income 22        under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) with 23        respect to the stock of the same person to whom the 24        intangible expenses and costs were directly or 25        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 26        sentence does not apply to the extent that the same   HB3117- 8 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 2        modification required under Section 203(a)(2)(D-17) of 3        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 4        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 5        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 6        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 7        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 8        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 9        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 10        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 11        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 12        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 13        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 14        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 15        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 16        similar types of intangible assets.17            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:18                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 19            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 20            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 21            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 22            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 23            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 24            with respect to such item; or25                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 26            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or   HB3117- 9 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 2            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 3            following:4                    (a) the person during the same taxable 5                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 6                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 7                not a related member, and8                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 9                intangible expense or cost between the 10                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 11                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 12                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 13                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 14                or15                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 16            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 17            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 18            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 19            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 20            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 21            writing to the application or use of an 22            alternative method of apportionment under Section 23            304(f); 24                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 25            Director from making any other adjustment 26            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act   HB3117- 10 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1            for any tax year beginning after the effective 2            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 3            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 4            Department and such regulations provide methods 5            and standards by which the Department will utilize 6            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 7            (D-19) For taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 9        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 10        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 11        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 12        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 13        business group but for the fact that the person is 14        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 15        included in the unitary business group because he or 16        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 17        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 18        addition modification required by this subparagraph 19        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 20        included in base income of the unitary group for the 21        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 22        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 23        (including amounts included in gross income under 24        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 25        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 26        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the   HB3117- 11 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 2        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 3        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 4        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 5        the addition modification required under Section 6        203(a)(2)(D-17) or Section 203(a)(2)(D-18) of this 7        Act; 8            (D-20) For taxable years beginning on or after 9        January 1, 2002 and ending on or before December 31, 10        2006, in the case of a distribution from a qualified 11        tuition program under Section 529 of the Internal 12        Revenue Code, other than (i) a distribution from a 13        College Savings Pool created under Section 16.5 of the 14        State Treasurer Act or (ii) a distribution from the 15        Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund, an amount equal 16        to the amount excluded from gross income under Section 17        529(c)(3)(B). For taxable years beginning on or after 18        January 1, 2007, in the case of a distribution from a 19        qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the 20        Internal Revenue Code, other than (i) a distribution 21        from a College Savings Pool created under Section 16.5 22        of the State Treasurer Act, (ii) a distribution from 23        the Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund, or (iii) a 24        distribution from a qualified tuition program under 25        Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code that (I) 26        adopts and determines that its offering materials   HB3117- 12 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        comply with the College Savings Plans Network's 2        disclosure principles and (II) has made reasonable 3        efforts to inform in-state residents of the existence 4        of in-state qualified tuition programs by informing 5        Illinois residents directly and, where applicable, to 6        inform financial intermediaries distributing the 7        program to inform in-state residents of the existence 8        of in-state qualified tuition programs at least 9        annually, an amount equal to the amount excluded from 10        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(B).11            For the purposes of this subparagraph (D-20), a 12        qualified tuition program has made reasonable efforts 13        if it makes disclosures (which may use the term 14        "in-state program" or "in-state plan" and need not 15        specifically refer to Illinois or its qualified 16        programs by name) (i) directly to prospective 17        participants in its offering materials or makes a 18        public disclosure, such as a website posting; and (ii) 19        where applicable, to intermediaries selling the 20        out-of-state program in the same manner that the 21        out-of-state program distributes its offering 22        materials;23            (D-20.5) For taxable years beginning on or after 24        January 1, 2018, in the case of a distribution from a 25        qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of the 26        Internal Revenue Code, other than a distribution from   HB3117- 13 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        a qualified ABLE program created under Section 16.6 of 2        the State Treasurer Act, an amount equal to the amount 3        excluded from gross income under Section 529A(c)(1)(B) 4        of the Internal Revenue Code; 5            (D-21) For taxable years beginning on or after 6        January 1, 2007, in the case of transfer of moneys from 7        a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the 8        Internal Revenue Code that is administered by the 9        State to an out-of-state program, an amount equal to 10        the amount of moneys previously deducted from base 11        income under subsection (a)(2)(Y) of this Section;12            (D-21.5) For taxable years beginning on or after 13        January 1, 2018, in the case of the transfer of moneys 14        from a qualified tuition program under Section 529 or 15        a qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of the 16        Internal Revenue Code that is administered by this 17        State to an ABLE account established under an 18        out-of-state ABLE account program, an amount equal to 19        the contribution component of the transferred amount 20        that was previously deducted from base income under 21        subsection (a)(2)(Y) or subsection (a)(2)(HH) of this 22        Section; 23            (D-22) For taxable years beginning on or after 24        January 1, 2009, and prior to January 1, 2018, in the 25        case of a nonqualified withdrawal or refund of moneys 26        from a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of   HB3117- 14 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        the Internal Revenue Code administered by the State 2        that is not used for qualified expenses at an eligible 3        education institution, an amount equal to the 4        contribution component of the nonqualified withdrawal 5        or refund that was previously deducted from base 6        income under subsection (a)(2)(y) of this Section, 7        provided that the withdrawal or refund did not result 8        from the beneficiary's death or disability. For 9        taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018: 10        (1) in the case of a nonqualified withdrawal or 11        refund, as defined under Section 16.5 of the State 12        Treasurer Act, of moneys from a qualified tuition 13        program under Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code 14        administered by the State, an amount equal to the 15        contribution component of the nonqualified withdrawal 16        or refund that was previously deducted from base 17        income under subsection (a)(2)(Y) of this Section, and 18        (2) in the case of a nonqualified withdrawal or refund 19        from a qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of 20        the Internal Revenue Code administered by the State 21        that is not used for qualified disability expenses, an 22        amount equal to the contribution component of the 23        nonqualified withdrawal or refund that was previously 24        deducted from base income under subsection (a)(2)(HH) 25        of this Section;26            (D-23) An amount equal to the credit allowable to   HB3117- 15 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 2        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 3        Act;4            (D-24) For taxable years ending on or after 5        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 6        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 7        for the taxable year; 8            (D-25) In the case of a resident, an amount equal 9        to the amount of tax for which a credit is allowed 10        pursuant to Section 201(p)(7) of this Act; 11    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 12    following amounts:13            (E) For taxable years ending before December 31, 14        2001, any amount included in such total in respect of 15        any compensation (including but not limited to any 16        compensation paid or accrued to a serviceman while a 17        prisoner of war or missing in action) paid to a 18        resident by reason of being on active duty in the Armed 19        Forces of the United States and in respect of any 20        compensation paid or accrued to a resident who as a 21        governmental employee was a prisoner of war or missing 22        in action, and in respect of any compensation paid to a 23        resident in 1971 or thereafter for annual training 24        performed pursuant to Sections 502 and 503, Title 32, 25        United States Code as a member of the Illinois 26        National Guard or, beginning with taxable years ending   HB3117- 16 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        on or after December 31, 2007, the National Guard of 2        any other state. For taxable years ending on or after 3        December 31, 2001, any amount included in such total 4        in respect of any compensation (including but not 5        limited to any compensation paid or accrued to a 6        serviceman while a prisoner of war or missing in 7        action) paid to a resident by reason of being a member 8        of any component of the Armed Forces of the United 9        States and in respect of any compensation paid or 10        accrued to a resident who as a governmental employee 11        was a prisoner of war or missing in action, and in 12        respect of any compensation paid to a resident in 2001 13        or thereafter by reason of being a member of the 14        Illinois National Guard or, beginning with taxable 15        years ending on or after December 31, 2007, the 16        National Guard of any other state. The provisions of 17        this subparagraph (E) are exempt from the provisions 18        of Section 250;19            (F) An amount equal to all amounts included in 20        such total pursuant to the provisions of Sections 21        402(a), 402(c), 403(a), 403(b), 406(a), 407(a), and 22        408 of the Internal Revenue Code, or included in such 23        total as distributions under the provisions of any 24        retirement or disability plan for employees of any 25        governmental agency or unit, or retirement payments to 26        retired partners, which payments are excluded in   HB3117- 17 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        computing net earnings from self employment by Section 2        1402 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 3        adopted pursuant thereto;4            (G) The valuation limitation amount;5            (H) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 6        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 7        and included in such total for the taxable year;8            (I) An amount equal to all amounts included in 9        such total pursuant to the provisions of Section 111 10        of the Internal Revenue Code as a recovery of items 11        previously deducted from adjusted gross income in the 12        computation of taxable income;13            (J) An amount equal to those dividends included in 14        such total which were paid by a corporation which 15        conducts business operations in a River Edge 16        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 17        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act, and conducts 18        substantially all of its operations in a River Edge 19        Redevelopment Zone or zones. This subparagraph (J) is 20        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;21            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 22        such total that were paid by a corporation that 23        conducts business operations in a federally designated 24        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 25        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 26        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in   HB3117- 18 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 2        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 3        this subparagraph (K);4            (L) For taxable years ending after December 31, 5        1983, an amount equal to all social security benefits 6        and railroad retirement benefits included in such 7        total pursuant to Sections 72(r) and 86 of the 8        Internal Revenue Code;9            (M) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 10        under subparagraph (N), an amount equal to the sum of 11        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 12        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 13        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 14        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 15        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 16        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 17        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 18        Internal Revenue Code, plus, for taxable years ending 19        on or after December 31, 2011, Section 45G(e)(3) of 20        the Internal Revenue Code and, for taxable years 21        ending on or after December 31, 2008, any amount 22        included in gross income under Section 87 of the 23        Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 24        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 25        250;26            (N) An amount equal to all amounts included in   HB3117- 19 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        such total which are exempt from taxation by this 2        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 3        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 4        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 5        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 6        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 7        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 8        net of bond premium amortization;9            (O) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 10        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 11        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;12            (P) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 13        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 14        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 15        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 16        the Internal Revenue Code or of any itemized deduction 17        taken from adjusted gross income in the computation of 18        taxable income for restoration of substantial amounts 19        held under claim of right for the taxable year;20            (Q) An amount equal to any amounts included in 21        such total, received by the taxpayer as an 22        acceleration in the payment of life, endowment or 23        annuity benefits in advance of the time they would 24        otherwise be payable as an indemnity for a terminal 25        illness;26            (R) An amount equal to the amount of any federal or   HB3117- 20 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        State bonus paid to veterans of the Persian Gulf War;2            (S) An amount, to the extent included in adjusted 3        gross income, equal to the amount of a contribution 4        made in the taxable year on behalf of the taxpayer to a 5        medical care savings account established under the 6        Medical Care Savings Account Act or the Medical Care 7        Savings Account Act of 2000 to the extent the 8        contribution is accepted by the account administrator 9        as provided in that Act;10            (T) An amount, to the extent included in adjusted 11        gross income, equal to the amount of interest earned 12        in the taxable year on a medical care savings account 13        established under the Medical Care Savings Account Act 14        or the Medical Care Savings Account Act of 2000 on 15        behalf of the taxpayer, other than interest added 16        pursuant to item (D-5) of this paragraph (2);17            (U) For one taxable year beginning on or after 18        January 1, 1994, an amount equal to the total amount of 19        tax imposed and paid under subsections (a) and (b) of 20        Section 201 of this Act on grant amounts received by 21        the taxpayer under the Nursing Home Grant Assistance 22        Act during the taxpayer's taxable years 1992 and 1993;23            (V) Beginning with tax years ending on or after 24        December 31, 1995 and ending with tax years ending on 25        or before December 31, 2004, an amount equal to the 26        amount paid by a taxpayer who is a self-employed   HB3117- 21 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        taxpayer, a partner of a partnership, or a shareholder 2        in a Subchapter S corporation for health insurance or 3        long-term care insurance for that taxpayer or that 4        taxpayer's spouse or dependents, to the extent that 5        the amount paid for that health insurance or long-term 6        care insurance may be deducted under Section 213 of 7        the Internal Revenue Code, has not been deducted on 8        the federal income tax return of the taxpayer, and 9        does not exceed the taxable income attributable to 10        that taxpayer's income, self-employment income, or 11        Subchapter S corporation income; except that no 12        deduction shall be allowed under this item (V) if the 13        taxpayer is eligible to participate in any health 14        insurance or long-term care insurance plan of an 15        employer of the taxpayer or the taxpayer's spouse. The 16        amount of the health insurance and long-term care 17        insurance subtracted under this item (V) shall be 18        determined by multiplying total health insurance and 19        long-term care insurance premiums paid by the taxpayer 20        times a number that represents the fractional 21        percentage of eligible medical expenses under Section 22        213 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 not actually 23        deducted on the taxpayer's federal income tax return;24            (W) For taxable years beginning on or after 25        January 1, 1998, all amounts included in the 26        taxpayer's federal gross income in the taxable year   HB3117- 22 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        from amounts converted from a regular IRA to a Roth 2        IRA. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 3        Section 250;4            (X) For taxable year 1999 and thereafter, an 5        amount equal to the amount of any (i) distributions, 6        to the extent includible in gross income for federal 7        income tax purposes, made to the taxpayer because of 8        his or her status as a victim of persecution for racial 9        or religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 10        regime or as an heir of the victim and (ii) items of 11        income, to the extent includible in gross income for 12        federal income tax purposes, attributable to, derived 13        from or in any way related to assets stolen from, 14        hidden from, or otherwise lost to a victim of 15        persecution for racial or religious reasons by Nazi 16        Germany or any other Axis regime immediately prior to, 17        during, and immediately after World War II, including, 18        but not limited to, interest on the proceeds 19        receivable as insurance under policies issued to a 20        victim of persecution for racial or religious reasons 21        by Nazi Germany or any other Axis regime by European 22        insurance companies immediately prior to and during 23        World War II; provided, however, this subtraction from 24        federal adjusted gross income does not apply to assets 25        acquired with such assets or with the proceeds from 26        the sale of such assets; provided, further, this   HB3117- 23 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        paragraph shall only apply to a taxpayer who was the 2        first recipient of such assets after their recovery 3        and who is a victim of persecution for racial or 4        religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 5        regime or as an heir of the victim. The amount of and 6        the eligibility for any public assistance, benefit, or 7        similar entitlement is not affected by the inclusion 8        of items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph in gross income 9        for federal income tax purposes. This paragraph is 10        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;11            (Y) For taxable years beginning on or after 12        January 1, 2002 and ending on or before December 31, 13        2004, moneys contributed in the taxable year to a 14        College Savings Pool account under Section 16.5 of the 15        State Treasurer Act, except that amounts excluded from 16        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) of the 17        Internal Revenue Code shall not be considered moneys 18        contributed under this subparagraph (Y). For taxable 19        years beginning on or after January 1, 2005, a maximum 20        of $10,000 contributed in the taxable year to (i) a 21        College Savings Pool account under Section 16.5 of the 22        State Treasurer Act or (ii) the Illinois Prepaid 23        Tuition Trust Fund, except that amounts excluded from 24        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) of the 25        Internal Revenue Code shall not be considered moneys 26        contributed under this subparagraph (Y). For purposes   HB3117- 24 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        of this subparagraph, contributions made by an 2        employer on behalf of an employee, or matching 3        contributions made by an employee, shall be treated as 4        made by the employee. This subparagraph (Y) is exempt 5        from the provisions of Section 250;6            (Z) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 7        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 8        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 9        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 10        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 11        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:12                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 13            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 14            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 15            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 16            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 17            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 18            including the bonus depreciation deduction;19                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 20            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 21            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 22            0.429); and23                (3) for taxable years ending after December 24            31, 2005:25                    (i) for property on which a bonus 26                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted   HB3117- 25 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 2                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 3                by 0.429);4                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 5                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 6                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 7                1.0;8                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 9                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 10                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 11                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 12                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 13                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 14                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 15                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 16                depreciation on that property; and17                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 18                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 19                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 20                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 21                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 22                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 23                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 24                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 25                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 26                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)).   HB3117- 26 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1            The aggregate amount deducted under this 2        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 3        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 4        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 5        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 6        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 7        subparagraph (Z) is exempt from the provisions of 8        Section 250;9            (AA) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 10        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 11        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 12        addition modification under subparagraph (D-15), then 13        an amount equal to that addition modification. 14            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 15        the last day of the last tax year for which a 16        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 17        under subparagraph (Z) and for which the taxpayer was 18        required in any taxable year to make an addition 19        modification under subparagraph (D-15), then an amount 20        equal to that addition modification. 21            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 22        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 23        one piece of property.24            This subparagraph (AA) is exempt from the 25        provisions of Section 250;26            (BB) Any amount included in adjusted gross income,   HB3117- 27 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        other than salary, received by a driver in a 2        ridesharing arrangement using a motor vehicle;3            (CC) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 4        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 5        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 6        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 7        modification with respect to such transaction under 8        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 9        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 10        the amount of that addition modification, and (ii) any 11        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 12        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 13        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 14        that is required to make an addition modification with 15        respect to such transaction under Section 16        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 17        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of that 18        addition modification. This subparagraph (CC) is 19        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;20            (DD) An amount equal to the interest income taken 21        into account for the taxable year (net of the 22        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 23        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 24        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 25        for the fact that the foreign person's business 26        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of   HB3117- 28 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 2        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 3        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 4        business group but for the fact that the person is 5        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 6        included in the unitary business group because he or 7        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 8        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 9        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 10        made for the same taxable year under Section 11        203(a)(2)(D-17) for interest paid, accrued, or 12        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 13        This subparagraph (DD) is exempt from the provisions 14        of Section 250; 15            (EE) An amount equal to the income from intangible 16        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 17        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 18        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 19        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 20        for the fact that the foreign person's business 21        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 22        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 23        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 24        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 25        business group but for the fact that the person is 26        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being   HB3117- 29 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        included in the unitary business group because he or 2        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 3        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 4        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 5        made for the same taxable year under Section 6        203(a)(2)(D-18) for intangible expenses and costs 7        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 8        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (EE) is 9        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;10            (FF) An amount equal to any amount awarded to the 11        taxpayer during the taxable year by the Court of 12        Claims under subsection (c) of Section 8 of the Court 13        of Claims Act for time unjustly served in a State 14        prison. This subparagraph (FF) is exempt from the 15        provisions of Section 250; 16            (GG) For taxable years ending on or after December 17        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 18        add back any insurance premiums under Section 19        203(a)(2)(D-19), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 20        that part of a reimbursement received from the 21        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 22        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 23        company) that would have been taken into account as a 24        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 25        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 26        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph   HB3117- 30 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        (GG), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 2        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 3        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (GG). This 4        subparagraph (GG) is exempt from the provisions of 5        Section 250; 6            (HH) For taxable years beginning on or after 7        January 1, 2018 and prior to January 1, 2028, a maximum 8        of $10,000 contributed in the taxable year to a 9        qualified ABLE account under Section 16.6 of the State 10        Treasurer Act, except that amounts excluded from gross 11        income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) or Section 12        529A(c)(1)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not 13        be considered moneys contributed under this 14        subparagraph (HH). For purposes of this subparagraph 15        (HH), contributions made by an employer on behalf of 16        an employee, or matching contributions made by an 17        employee, shall be treated as made by the employee; 18            (II) For taxable years that begin on or after 19        January 1, 2021 and begin before January 1, 2026, the 20        amount that is included in the taxpayer's federal 21        adjusted gross income pursuant to Section 61 of the 22        Internal Revenue Code as discharge of indebtedness 23        attributable to student loan forgiveness and that is 24        not excluded from the taxpayer's federal adjusted 25        gross income pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection 26        (f) of Section 108 of the Internal Revenue Code;   HB3117- 31 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1            (JJ) For taxable years beginning on or after 2        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 3        operating in this State and licensed under the 4        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 5        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 6        organization operating in this State and licensed 7        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 8        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 9        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 10        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 11        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 12        this subparagraph (JJ) are exempt from the provisions 13        of Section 250; and 14            (KK) To the extent includible in gross income for 15        federal income tax purposes, any amount awarded or 16        paid to the taxpayer as a result of a judgment or 17        settlement for fertility fraud as provided in Section 18        15 of the Illinois Fertility Fraud Act, donor 19        fertility fraud as provided in Section 20 of the 20        Illinois Fertility Fraud Act, or similar action in 21        another state; and 22            (LL) For taxable years beginning on or after 23        January 1, 2026, if the taxpayer is a qualified 24        worker, as defined in the Workforce Development 25        through Charitable Loan Repayment Act, an amount equal 26        to the amount included in the taxpayer's federal   HB3117- 32 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        adjusted gross income that is attributable to student 2        loan repayment assistance received by the taxpayer 3        during the taxable year from a qualified community 4        foundation under the provisions of the Workforce 5        Development through Through Charitable Loan Repayment 6        Act. 7            This subparagraph (LL) is exempt from the 8        provisions of Section 250; . 9            (MM) (LL) For taxable years beginning on or after 10        January 1, 2025, if the taxpayer is an eligible 11        resident as defined in the Medical Debt Relief Act, an 12        amount equal to the amount included in the taxpayer's 13        federal adjusted gross income that is attributable to 14        medical debt relief received by the taxpayer during 15        the taxable year from a nonprofit medical debt relief 16        coordinator under the provisions of the Medical Debt 17        Relief Act. This subparagraph (MM) (LL) is exempt from 18        the provisions of Section 250; and . 19            (NN) For taxable years beginning on or after 20        January 1, 2026, an amount equal to the capital gains 21        realized by the taxpayer from the taking of property 22        by eminent domain to the extent that those gains are 23        included in the taxpayer's federal taxable income; 24        this subparagraph (NN) is exempt from the provisions 25        of Section 250;    HB3117- 33 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1    (b) Corporations.2        (1) In general. In the case of a corporation, base 3    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 4    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).5        (2) Modifications. The taxable income referred to in 6    paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum 7    of the following amounts:8            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 9        to the taxpayer as interest and all distributions 10        received from regulated investment companies during 11        the taxable year to the extent excluded from gross 12        income in the computation of taxable income;13            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 14        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 15        the computation of taxable income for the taxable 16        year;17            (C) In the case of a regulated investment company, 18        an amount equal to the excess of (i) the net long-term 19        capital gain for the taxable year, over (ii) the 20        amount of the capital gain dividends designated as 21        such in accordance with Section 852(b)(3)(C) of the 22        Internal Revenue Code and any amount designated under 23        Section 852(b)(3)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, 24        attributable to the taxable year (this amendatory Act 25        of 1995 (Public Act 89-89) is declarative of existing 26        law and is not a new enactment);  HB3117- 34 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1            (D) The amount of any net operating loss deduction 2        taken in arriving at taxable income, other than a net 3        operating loss carried forward from a taxable year 4        ending prior to December 31, 1986;5            (E) For taxable years in which a net operating 6        loss carryback or carryforward from a taxable year 7        ending prior to December 31, 1986 is an element of 8        taxable income under paragraph (1) of subsection (e) 9        or subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection 10        (e), the amount by which addition modifications other 11        than those provided by this subparagraph (E) exceeded 12        subtraction modifications in such earlier taxable 13        year, with the following limitations applied in the 14        order that they are listed:15                (i) the addition modification relating to the 16            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 17            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 18            December 31, 1986 shall be reduced by the amount 19            of addition modification under this subparagraph 20            (E) which related to that net operating loss and 21            which was taken into account in calculating the 22            base income of an earlier taxable year, and23                (ii) the addition modification relating to the 24            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 25            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 26            December 31, 1986 shall not exceed the amount of   HB3117- 35 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1            such carryback or carryforward;2            For taxable years in which there is a net 3        operating loss carryback or carryforward from more 4        than one other taxable year ending prior to December 5        31, 1986, the addition modification provided in this 6        subparagraph (E) shall be the sum of the amounts 7        computed independently under the preceding provisions 8        of this subparagraph (E) for each such taxable year;9            (E-5) For taxable years ending after December 31, 10        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 11        costs that the corporation deducted in computing 12        adjusted gross income and for which the corporation 13        claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 201;14            (E-10) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 15        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 16        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 17        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 18        the Internal Revenue Code;19            (E-11) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 20        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 21        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 22        addition modification under subparagraph (E-10), then 23        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 24        deductions taken in all taxable years under 25        subparagraph (T) with respect to that property.26            If the taxpayer continues to own property through   HB3117- 36 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        the last day of the last tax year for which a 2        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 3        under subparagraph (T) and for which the taxpayer was 4        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 5        modification under subparagraph (T), then an amount 6        equal to that subtraction modification. 7            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 8        modification under this subparagraph only once with 9        respect to any one piece of property;10            (E-12) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 11        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 12        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 13        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 14        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 15        member of the same unitary business group but for the 16        fact the foreign person's business activity outside 17        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 18        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 19        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 20        who would be a member of the same unitary business 21        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 22        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 23        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 24        required to apportion business income under different 25        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 26        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the   HB3117- 37 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        extent that dividends were included in base income of 2        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 3        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 4        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 5        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 6        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 7        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 8        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 9        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 10        accrued, or incurred. 11            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 12                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 13            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 14            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 15            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 16            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 17            with respect to such interest; or18                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 19            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 20            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 21            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 22            following:23                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 24                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 25                to a person that is not a related member, and26                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the   HB3117- 38 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 2                person did not have as a principal purpose the 3                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 4                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 5                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 6                terms; or 7                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 8            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 9            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 10            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 11            and terms and the principal purpose for the 12            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 13            or 14                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 15            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 16            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 17            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 18            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 19            to the application or use of an alternative method 20            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 21                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 22            Director from making any other adjustment 23            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 24            for any tax year beginning after the effective 25            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 26            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the   HB3117- 39 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1            Department and such regulations provide methods 2            and standards by which the Department will utilize 3            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 4            (E-13) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 5        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 6        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 7        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 8        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 9        foreign person who would be a member of the same 10        unitary business group but for the fact that the 11        foreign person's business activity outside the United 12        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 13        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 14        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 15        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 16        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 17        from being included in the unitary business group 18        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 19        business income under different subsections of Section 20        304. The addition modification required by this 21        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 22        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 23        group for the same taxable year and received by the 24        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 25        business group (including amounts included in gross 26        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the   HB3117- 40 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 2        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 3        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 4        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 5        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 6        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 7        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 8        modification required under Section 203(b)(2)(E-12) of 9        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 10        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 11        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 12        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 13        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 14        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 15        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 16        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 17        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 18        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 19        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 20        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 21        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 22        similar types of intangible assets.23            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:24                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 25            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 26            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who   HB3117- 41 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 2            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 3            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 4            with respect to such item; or5                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 6            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 7            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 8            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 9            following:10                    (a) the person during the same taxable 11                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 12                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 13                not a related member, and14                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 15                intangible expense or cost between the 16                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 17                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 18                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 19                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 20                or21                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 22            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 23            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 24            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 25            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 26            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in   HB3117- 42 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1            writing to the application or use of an 2            alternative method of apportionment under Section 3            304(f); 4                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 5            Director from making any other adjustment 6            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 7            for any tax year beginning after the effective 8            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 9            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 10            Department and such regulations provide methods 11            and standards by which the Department will utilize 12            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 13            (E-14) For taxable years ending on or after 14        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 15        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 16        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 17        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 18        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 19        business group but for the fact that the person is 20        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 21        included in the unitary business group because he or 22        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 23        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 24        addition modification required by this subparagraph 25        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 26        included in base income of the unitary group for the   HB3117- 43 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 2        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 3        (including amounts included in gross income under 4        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 5        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 6        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 7        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 8        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 9        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 10        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 11        the addition modification required under Section 12        203(b)(2)(E-12) or Section 203(b)(2)(E-13) of this 13        Act; 14            (E-15) For taxable years beginning after December 15        31, 2008, any deduction for dividends paid by a 16        captive real estate investment trust that is allowed 17        to a real estate investment trust under Section 18        857(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code for 19        dividends paid;20            (E-16) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 21        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 22        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 23        Act;24            (E-17) For taxable years ending on or after 25        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 26        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code   HB3117- 44 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        for the taxable year; 2            (E-18) for taxable years beginning after December 3        31, 2018, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 4        under Section 250(a)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue 5        Code for the taxable year; 6            (E-19) for taxable years ending on or after June 7        30, 2021, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 8        under Section 250(a)(1)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue 9        Code for the taxable year; 10            (E-20) for taxable years ending on or after June 11        30, 2021, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 12        under Sections 243(e) and 245A(a) of the Internal 13        Revenue Code for the taxable year; 14            (E-21) the amount that is claimed as a federal 15        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 16        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 17        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 18        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 19        Tax Credit Act; 20    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 21    following amounts:22            (F) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 23        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 24        and included in such total for the taxable year;25            (G) An amount equal to any amount included in such 26        total under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code;  HB3117- 45 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1            (H) In the case of a regulated investment company, 2        an amount equal to the amount of exempt interest 3        dividends as defined in subsection (b)(5) of Section 4        852 of the Internal Revenue Code, paid to shareholders 5        for the taxable year;6            (I) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 7        under subparagraph (J), an amount equal to the sum of 8        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 9        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) and amounts disallowed as 10        interest expense by Section 291(a)(3) of the Internal 11        Revenue Code, and all amounts of expenses allocable to 12        interest and disallowed as deductions by Section 13        265(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for 14        taxable years ending on or after August 13, 1999, 15        Sections 171(a)(2), 265, 280C, 291(a)(3), and 16        832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, plus, 17        for tax years ending on or after December 31, 2011, 18        amounts disallowed as deductions by Section 45G(e)(3) 19        of the Internal Revenue Code and, for taxable years 20        ending on or after December 31, 2008, any amount 21        included in gross income under Section 87 of the 22        Internal Revenue Code and the policyholders' share of 23        tax-exempt interest of a life insurance company under 24        Section 807(a)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code (in 25        the case of a life insurance company with gross income 26        from a decrease in reserves for the tax year) or   HB3117- 46 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        Section 807(b)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code (in 2        the case of a life insurance company allowed a 3        deduction for an increase in reserves for the tax 4        year); the provisions of this subparagraph are exempt 5        from the provisions of Section 250;6            (J) An amount equal to all amounts included in 7        such total which are exempt from taxation by this 8        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 9        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 10        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 11        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 12        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 13        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 14        net of bond premium amortization;15            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 16        such total which were paid by a corporation which 17        conducts business operations in a River Edge 18        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 19        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 20        all of its operations in a River Edge Redevelopment 21        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (K) is exempt from 22        the provisions of Section 250;23            (L) An amount equal to those dividends included in 24        such total that were paid by a corporation that 25        conducts business operations in a federally designated 26        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated   HB3117- 47 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 2        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 3        subparagraph (K) of paragraph 2 of this subsection 4        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 5        this subparagraph (L);6            (M) For any taxpayer that is a financial 7        organization within the meaning of Section 304(c) of 8        this Act, an amount included in such total as interest 9        income from a loan or loans made by such taxpayer to a 10        borrower, to the extent that such a loan is secured by 11        property which is eligible for the River Edge 12        Redevelopment Zone Investment Credit. To determine the 13        portion of a loan or loans that is secured by property 14        eligible for a Section 201(f) investment credit to the 15        borrower, the entire principal amount of the loan or 16        loans between the taxpayer and the borrower should be 17        divided into the basis of the Section 201(f) 18        investment credit property which secures the loan or 19        loans, using for this purpose the original basis of 20        such property on the date that it was placed in service 21        in the River Edge Redevelopment Zone. The subtraction 22        modification available to the taxpayer in any year 23        under this subsection shall be that portion of the 24        total interest paid by the borrower with respect to 25        such loan attributable to the eligible property as 26        calculated under the previous sentence. This   HB3117- 48 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        subparagraph (M) is exempt from the provisions of 2        Section 250;3            (M-1) For any taxpayer that is a financial 4        organization within the meaning of Section 304(c) of 5        this Act, an amount included in such total as interest 6        income from a loan or loans made by such taxpayer to a 7        borrower, to the extent that such a loan is secured by 8        property which is eligible for the High Impact 9        Business Investment Credit. To determine the portion 10        of a loan or loans that is secured by property eligible 11        for a Section 201(h) investment credit to the 12        borrower, the entire principal amount of the loan or 13        loans between the taxpayer and the borrower should be 14        divided into the basis of the Section 201(h) 15        investment credit property which secures the loan or 16        loans, using for this purpose the original basis of 17        such property on the date that it was placed in service 18        in a federally designated Foreign Trade Zone or 19        Sub-Zone located in Illinois. No taxpayer that is 20        eligible for the deduction provided in subparagraph 21        (M) of paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be 22        eligible for the deduction provided under this 23        subparagraph (M-1). The subtraction modification 24        available to taxpayers in any year under this 25        subsection shall be that portion of the total interest 26        paid by the borrower with respect to such loan   HB3117- 49 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        attributable to the eligible property as calculated 2        under the previous sentence;3            (N) Two times any contribution made during the 4        taxable year to a designated zone organization to the 5        extent that the contribution (i) qualifies as a 6        charitable contribution under subsection (c) of 7        Section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code and (ii) 8        must, by its terms, be used for a project approved by 9        the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 10        under Section 11 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act 11        or under Section 10-10 of the River Edge Redevelopment 12        Zone Act. This subparagraph (N) is exempt from the 13        provisions of Section 250;14            (O) An amount equal to: (i) 85% for taxable years 15        ending on or before December 31, 1992, or, a 16        percentage equal to the percentage allowable under 17        Section 243(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 18        for taxable years ending after December 31, 1992, of 19        the amount by which dividends included in taxable 20        income and received from a corporation that is not 21        created or organized under the laws of the United 22        States or any state or political subdivision thereof, 23        including, for taxable years ending on or after 24        December 31, 1988, dividends received or deemed 25        received or paid or deemed paid under Sections 951 26        through 965 of the Internal Revenue Code, exceed the   HB3117- 50 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        amount of the modification provided under subparagraph 2        (G) of paragraph (2) of this subsection (b) which is 3        related to such dividends, and including, for taxable 4        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, dividends 5        received from a captive real estate investment trust; 6        plus (ii) 100% of the amount by which dividends, 7        included in taxable income and received, including, 8        for taxable years ending on or after December 31, 9        1988, dividends received or deemed received or paid or 10        deemed paid under Sections 951 through 964 of the 11        Internal Revenue Code and including, for taxable years 12        ending on or after December 31, 2008, dividends 13        received from a captive real estate investment trust, 14        from any such corporation specified in clause (i) that 15        would but for the provisions of Section 1504(b)(3) of 16        the Internal Revenue Code be treated as a member of the 17        affiliated group which includes the dividend 18        recipient, exceed the amount of the modification 19        provided under subparagraph (G) of paragraph (2) of 20        this subsection (b) which is related to such 21        dividends. For taxable years ending on or after June 22        30, 2021, (i) for purposes of this subparagraph, the 23        term "dividend" does not include any amount treated as 24        a dividend under Section 1248 of the Internal Revenue 25        Code, and (ii) this subparagraph shall not apply to 26        dividends for which a deduction is allowed under   HB3117- 51 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        Section 245(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. This 2        subparagraph (O) is exempt from the provisions of 3        Section 250 of this Act;4            (P) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 5        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 6        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;7            (Q) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 8        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 9        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 10        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 11        the Internal Revenue Code;12            (R) On and after July 20, 1999, in the case of an 13        attorney-in-fact with respect to whom an interinsurer 14        or a reciprocal insurer has made the election under 15        Section 835 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 16        835, an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the 17        amounts paid or incurred by that interinsurer or 18        reciprocal insurer in the taxable year to the 19        attorney-in-fact over the deduction allowed to that 20        interinsurer or reciprocal insurer with respect to the 21        attorney-in-fact under Section 835(b) of the Internal 22        Revenue Code for the taxable year; the provisions of 23        this subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of 24        Section 250;25            (S) For taxable years ending on or after December 26        31, 1997, in the case of a Subchapter S corporation, an   HB3117- 52 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        amount equal to all amounts of income allocable to a 2        shareholder subject to the Personal Property Tax 3        Replacement Income Tax imposed by subsections (c) and 4        (d) of Section 201 of this Act, including amounts 5        allocable to organizations exempt from federal income 6        tax by reason of Section 501(a) of the Internal 7        Revenue Code. This subparagraph (S) is exempt from the 8        provisions of Section 250;9            (T) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 10        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 11        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 12        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 13        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 14        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:15                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 16            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 17            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 18            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 19            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 20            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 21            including the bonus depreciation deduction;22                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 23            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 24            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 25            0.429); and26                (3) for taxable years ending after December   HB3117- 53 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1            31, 2005:2                    (i) for property on which a bonus 3                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 4                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 5                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 6                by 0.429);7                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 8                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 9                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 10                1.0;11                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 12                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 13                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 14                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 15                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 16                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 17                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 18                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 19                depreciation on that property; and20                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 21                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 22                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 23                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 24                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 25                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 26                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and   HB3117- 54 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 2                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 3                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 4            The aggregate amount deducted under this 5        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 6        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 7        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 8        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 9        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 10        subparagraph (T) is exempt from the provisions of 11        Section 250;12            (U) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 13        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 14        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 15        modification under subparagraph (E-10), then an amount 16        equal to that addition modification.17            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 18        the last day of the last tax year for which a 19        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 20        under subparagraph (T) and for which the taxpayer was 21        required in any taxable year to make an addition 22        modification under subparagraph (E-10), then an amount 23        equal to that addition modification. 24            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 25        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 26        one piece of property.  HB3117- 55 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1            This subparagraph (U) is exempt from the 2        provisions of Section 250;3            (V) The amount of: (i) any interest income (net of 4        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 5        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 6        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 7        modification with respect to such transaction under 8        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 9        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 10        the amount of such addition modification, (ii) any 11        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 12        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 13        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 14        that is required to make an addition modification with 15        respect to such transaction under Section 16        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 17        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 18        addition modification, and (iii) any insurance premium 19        income (net of deductions allocable thereto) taken 20        into account for the taxable year with respect to a 21        transaction with a taxpayer that is required to make 22        an addition modification with respect to such 23        transaction under Section 203(a)(2)(D-19), Section 24        203(b)(2)(E-14), Section 203(c)(2)(G-14), or Section 25        203(d)(2)(D-9), but not to exceed the amount of that 26        addition modification. This subparagraph (V) is exempt   HB3117- 56 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        from the provisions of Section 250; 2            (W) An amount equal to the interest income taken 3        into account for the taxable year (net of the 4        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 5        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 6        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 7        for the fact that the foreign person's business 8        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 9        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 10        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 11        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 12        business group but for the fact that the person is 13        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 14        included in the unitary business group because he or 15        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 16        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 17        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 18        made for the same taxable year under Section 19        203(b)(2)(E-12) for interest paid, accrued, or 20        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 21        This subparagraph (W) is exempt from the provisions of 22        Section 250; 23            (X) An amount equal to the income from intangible 24        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 25        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 26        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a   HB3117- 57 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 2        for the fact that the foreign person's business 3        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 4        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 5        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 6        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 7        business group but for the fact that the person is 8        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 9        included in the unitary business group because he or 10        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 11        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 12        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 13        made for the same taxable year under Section 14        203(b)(2)(E-13) for intangible expenses and costs 15        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 16        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (X) is 17        exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 18            (Y) For taxable years ending on or after December 19        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 20        add back any insurance premiums under Section 21        203(b)(2)(E-14), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 22        that part of a reimbursement received from the 23        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 24        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 25        company) that would have been taken into account as a 26        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the   HB3117- 58 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 2        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 3        (Y), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 4        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 5        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (Y). This 6        subparagraph (Y) is exempt from the provisions of 7        Section 250; 8            (Z) The difference between the nondeductible 9        controlled foreign corporation dividends under Section 10        965(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code over the 11        taxable income of the taxpayer, computed without 12        regard to Section 965(e)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue 13        Code, and without regard to any net operating loss 14        deduction. This subparagraph (Z) is exempt from the 15        provisions of Section 250; and 16            (AA) For taxable years beginning on or after 17        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 18        operating in this State and licensed under the 19        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 20        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 21        organization operating in this State and licensed 22        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 23        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 24        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 25        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 26        added back under this subsection. The provisions of   HB3117- 59 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        this subparagraph (AA) are exempt from the provisions 2        of Section 250; and . 3            (BB) For taxable years beginning on or after 4        January 1, 2024, an amount equal to the capital gains 5        realized by the taxpayer from the taking of property 6        by eminent domain to the extent that those gains are 7        included in the taxpayer's federal taxable income; 8        this subparagraph (AA) is exempt from the provisions 9        of Section 250; 10        (3) Special rule. For purposes of paragraph (2)(A), 11    "gross income" in the case of a life insurance company, 12    for tax years ending on and after December 31, 1994, and 13    prior to December 31, 2011, shall mean the gross 14    investment income for the taxable year and, for tax years 15    ending on or after December 31, 2011, shall mean all 16    amounts included in life insurance gross income under 17    Section 803(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. 18    (c) Trusts and estates.19        (1) In general. In the case of a trust or estate, base 20    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 21    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).22        (2) Modifications. Subject to the provisions of 23    paragraph (3), the taxable income referred to in paragraph 24    (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum of the 25    following amounts:  HB3117- 60 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 2        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 3        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 4        in the computation of taxable income;5            (B) In the case of (i) an estate, $600; (ii) a 6        trust which, under its governing instrument, is 7        required to distribute all of its income currently, 8        $300; and (iii) any other trust, $100, but in each such 9        case, only to the extent such amount was deducted in 10        the computation of taxable income;11            (C) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 12        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 13        the computation of taxable income for the taxable 14        year;15            (D) The amount of any net operating loss deduction 16        taken in arriving at taxable income, other than a net 17        operating loss carried forward from a taxable year 18        ending prior to December 31, 1986;19            (E) For taxable years in which a net operating 20        loss carryback or carryforward from a taxable year 21        ending prior to December 31, 1986 is an element of 22        taxable income under paragraph (1) of subsection (e) 23        or subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection 24        (e), the amount by which addition modifications other 25        than those provided by this subparagraph (E) exceeded 26        subtraction modifications in such taxable year, with   HB3117- 61 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        the following limitations applied in the order that 2        they are listed:3                (i) the addition modification relating to the 4            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 5            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 6            December 31, 1986 shall be reduced by the amount 7            of addition modification under this subparagraph 8            (E) which related to that net operating loss and 9            which was taken into account in calculating the 10            base income of an earlier taxable year, and11                (ii) the addition modification relating to the 12            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 13            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 14            December 31, 1986 shall not exceed the amount of 15            such carryback or carryforward;16            For taxable years in which there is a net 17        operating loss carryback or carryforward from more 18        than one other taxable year ending prior to December 19        31, 1986, the addition modification provided in this 20        subparagraph (E) shall be the sum of the amounts 21        computed independently under the preceding provisions 22        of this subparagraph (E) for each such taxable year;23            (F) For taxable years ending on or after January 24        1, 1989, an amount equal to the tax deducted pursuant 25        to Section 164 of the Internal Revenue Code if the 26        trust or estate is claiming the same tax for purposes   HB3117- 62 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        of the Illinois foreign tax credit under Section 601 2        of this Act;3            (G) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 4        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 5        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 6        computation of taxable income;7            (G-5) For taxable years ending after December 31, 8        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 9        costs that the trust or estate deducted in computing 10        adjusted gross income and for which the trust or 11        estate claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 12        201;13            (G-10) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 14        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 15        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 16        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 17        the Internal Revenue Code; and18            (G-11) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 19        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 20        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 21        addition modification under subparagraph (G-10), then 22        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 23        deductions taken in all taxable years under 24        subparagraph (R) with respect to that property.25            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 26        the last day of the last tax year for which a   HB3117- 63 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 2        under subparagraph (R) and for which the taxpayer was 3        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 4        modification under subparagraph (R), then an amount 5        equal to that subtraction modification. 6            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 7        modification under this subparagraph only once with 8        respect to any one piece of property;9            (G-12) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 10        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 11        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 12        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 13        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 14        member of the same unitary business group but for the 15        fact that the foreign person's business activity 16        outside the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 17        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 18        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 19        who would be a member of the same unitary business 20        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 21        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 22        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 23        required to apportion business income under different 24        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 25        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 26        extent that dividends were included in base income of   HB3117- 64 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 2        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 3        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 4        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 5        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 6        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 7        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 8        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 9        accrued, or incurred. 10            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 11                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 12            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 13            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 14            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 15            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 16            with respect to such interest; or17                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 18            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 19            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 20            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 21            following:22                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 23                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 24                to a person that is not a related member, and25                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 26                interest expense between the taxpayer and the   HB3117- 65 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1                person did not have as a principal purpose the 2                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 3                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 4                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 5                terms; or 6                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 7            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 8            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 9            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 10            and terms and the principal purpose for the 11            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 12            or 13                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 14            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 15            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 16            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 17            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 18            to the application or use of an alternative method 19            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 20                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 21            Director from making any other adjustment 22            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 23            for any tax year beginning after the effective 24            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 25            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 26            Department and such regulations provide methods   HB3117- 66 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1            and standards by which the Department will utilize 2            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 3            (G-13) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 4        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 5        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 6        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 7        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 8        foreign person who would be a member of the same 9        unitary business group but for the fact that the 10        foreign person's business activity outside the United 11        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 12        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 13        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 14        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 15        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 16        from being included in the unitary business group 17        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 18        business income under different subsections of Section 19        304. The addition modification required by this 20        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 21        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 22        group for the same taxable year and received by the 23        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 24        business group (including amounts included in gross 25        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 26        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross   HB3117- 67 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 2        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 3        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 4        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 5        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 6        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 7        modification required under Section 203(c)(2)(G-12) of 8        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 9        "intangible expenses and costs" includes: (1) 10        expenses, losses, and costs for or related to the 11        direct or indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or 12        management, ownership, sale, exchange, or any other 13        disposition of intangible property; (2) losses 14        incurred, directly or indirectly, from factoring 15        transactions or discounting transactions; (3) royalty, 16        patent, technical, and copyright fees; (4) licensing 17        fees; and (5) other similar expenses and costs. For 18        purposes of this subparagraph, "intangible property" 19        includes patents, patent applications, trade names, 20        trademarks, service marks, copyrights, mask works, 21        trade secrets, and similar types of intangible assets.22            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:23                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 24            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 25            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 26            is subject in a foreign country or state, other   HB3117- 68 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 2            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 3            with respect to such item; or4                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 5            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 6            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 7            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 8            following:9                    (a) the person during the same taxable 10                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 11                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 12                not a related member, and13                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 14                intangible expense or cost between the 15                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 16                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 17                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 18                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 19                or20                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 21            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 22            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 23            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 24            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 25            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 26            writing to the application or use of an   HB3117- 69 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1            alternative method of apportionment under Section 2            304(f); 3                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 4            Director from making any other adjustment 5            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 6            for any tax year beginning after the effective 7            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 8            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 9            Department and such regulations provide methods 10            and standards by which the Department will utilize 11            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 12            (G-14) For taxable years ending on or after 13        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 14        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 15        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 16        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 17        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 18        business group but for the fact that the person is 19        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 20        included in the unitary business group because he or 21        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 22        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 23        addition modification required by this subparagraph 24        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 25        included in base income of the unitary group for the 26        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a   HB3117- 70 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 2        (including amounts included in gross income under 3        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 4        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 5        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 6        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 7        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 8        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 9        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 10        the addition modification required under Section 11        203(c)(2)(G-12) or Section 203(c)(2)(G-13) of this 12        Act;13            (G-15) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 14        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 15        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 16        Act;17            (G-16) For taxable years ending on or after 18        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 19        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 20        for the taxable year; 21            (G-17) the amount that is claimed as a federal 22        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 23        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 24        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 25        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 26        Tax Credit Act;   HB3117- 71 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 2    following amounts:3            (H) An amount equal to all amounts included in 4        such total pursuant to the provisions of Sections 5        402(a), 402(c), 403(a), 403(b), 406(a), 407(a) and 408 6        of the Internal Revenue Code or included in such total 7        as distributions under the provisions of any 8        retirement or disability plan for employees of any 9        governmental agency or unit, or retirement payments to 10        retired partners, which payments are excluded in 11        computing net earnings from self employment by Section 12        1402 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 13        adopted pursuant thereto;14            (I) The valuation limitation amount;15            (J) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 16        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 17        and included in such total for the taxable year;18            (K) An amount equal to all amounts included in 19        taxable income as modified by subparagraphs (A), (B), 20        (C), (D), (E), (F) and (G) which are exempt from 21        taxation by this State either by reason of its 22        statutes or Constitution or by reason of the 23        Constitution, treaties or statutes of the United 24        States; provided that, in the case of any statute of 25        this State that exempts income derived from bonds or 26        other obligations from the tax imposed under this Act,   HB3117- 72 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        the amount exempted shall be the interest net of bond 2        premium amortization;3            (L) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 4        under subparagraph (K), an amount equal to the sum of 5        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 6        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 7        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 8        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 9        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 10        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 11        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 12        Internal Revenue Code, plus, (iii) for taxable years 13        ending on or after December 31, 2011, Section 14        45G(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and, for 15        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, 16        any amount included in gross income under Section 87 17        of the Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 18        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 19        250;20            (M) An amount equal to those dividends included in 21        such total which were paid by a corporation which 22        conducts business operations in a River Edge 23        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 24        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 25        all of its operations in a River Edge Redevelopment 26        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (M) is exempt from   HB3117- 73 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        the provisions of Section 250;2            (N) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 3        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 4        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;5            (O) An amount equal to those dividends included in 6        such total that were paid by a corporation that 7        conducts business operations in a federally designated 8        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 9        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 10        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 11        subparagraph (M) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 12        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 13        this subparagraph (O);14            (P) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 15        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 16        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 17        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 18        the Internal Revenue Code;19            (Q) For taxable year 1999 and thereafter, an 20        amount equal to the amount of any (i) distributions, 21        to the extent includible in gross income for federal 22        income tax purposes, made to the taxpayer because of 23        his or her status as a victim of persecution for racial 24        or religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 25        regime or as an heir of the victim and (ii) items of 26        income, to the extent includible in gross income for   HB3117- 74 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        federal income tax purposes, attributable to, derived 2        from or in any way related to assets stolen from, 3        hidden from, or otherwise lost to a victim of 4        persecution for racial or religious reasons by Nazi 5        Germany or any other Axis regime immediately prior to, 6        during, and immediately after World War II, including, 7        but not limited to, interest on the proceeds 8        receivable as insurance under policies issued to a 9        victim of persecution for racial or religious reasons 10        by Nazi Germany or any other Axis regime by European 11        insurance companies immediately prior to and during 12        World War II; provided, however, this subtraction from 13        federal adjusted gross income does not apply to assets 14        acquired with such assets or with the proceeds from 15        the sale of such assets; provided, further, this 16        paragraph shall only apply to a taxpayer who was the 17        first recipient of such assets after their recovery 18        and who is a victim of persecution for racial or 19        religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 20        regime or as an heir of the victim. The amount of and 21        the eligibility for any public assistance, benefit, or 22        similar entitlement is not affected by the inclusion 23        of items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph in gross income 24        for federal income tax purposes. This paragraph is 25        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;26            (R) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the   HB3117- 75 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 2        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 3        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 4        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 5        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:6                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 7            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 8            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 9            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 10            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 11            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 12            including the bonus depreciation deduction;13                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 14            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 15            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 16            0.429); and17                (3) for taxable years ending after December 18            31, 2005:19                    (i) for property on which a bonus 20                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 21                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 22                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 23                by 0.429);24                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 25                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 26                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by   HB3117- 76 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1                1.0;2                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 3                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 4                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 5                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 6                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 7                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 8                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 9                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 10                depreciation on that property; and11                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 12                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 13                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 14                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 15                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 16                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 17                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 18                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 19                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 20                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 21            The aggregate amount deducted under this 22        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 23        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 24        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 25        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 26        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This   HB3117- 77 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        subparagraph (R) is exempt from the provisions of 2        Section 250;3            (S) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 4        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 5        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 6        modification under subparagraph (G-10), then an amount 7        equal to that addition modification.8            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 9        the last day of the last tax year for which a 10        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 11        under subparagraph (R) and for which the taxpayer was 12        required in any taxable year to make an addition 13        modification under subparagraph (G-10), then an amount 14        equal to that addition modification. 15            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 16        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 17        one piece of property.18            This subparagraph (S) is exempt from the 19        provisions of Section 250;20            (T) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 21        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 22        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 23        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 24        modification with respect to such transaction under 25        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 26        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed   HB3117- 78 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        the amount of such addition modification and (ii) any 2        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 3        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 4        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 5        that is required to make an addition modification with 6        respect to such transaction under Section 7        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 8        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 9        addition modification. This subparagraph (T) is exempt 10        from the provisions of Section 250; 11            (U) An amount equal to the interest income taken 12        into account for the taxable year (net of the 13        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 14        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 15        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 16        for the fact the foreign person's business activity 17        outside the United States is 80% or more of that 18        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 19        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 20        who would be a member of the same unitary business 21        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 22        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 23        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 24        required to apportion business income under different 25        subsections of Section 304, but not to exceed the 26        addition modification required to be made for the same   HB3117- 79 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        taxable year under Section 203(c)(2)(G-12) for 2        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 3        indirectly, to the same person. This subparagraph (U) 4        is exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 5            (V) An amount equal to the income from intangible 6        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 7        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 8        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 9        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 10        for the fact that the foreign person's business 11        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 12        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 13        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 14        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 15        business group but for the fact that the person is 16        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 17        included in the unitary business group because he or 18        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 19        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 20        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 21        made for the same taxable year under Section 22        203(c)(2)(G-13) for intangible expenses and costs 23        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 24        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (V) is 25        exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 26            (W) in the case of an estate, an amount equal to   HB3117- 80 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        all amounts included in such total pursuant to the 2        provisions of Section 111 of the Internal Revenue Code 3        as a recovery of items previously deducted by the 4        decedent from adjusted gross income in the computation 5        of taxable income. This subparagraph (W) is exempt 6        from Section 250; 7            (X) an amount equal to the refund included in such 8        total of any tax deducted for federal income tax 9        purposes, to the extent that deduction was added back 10        under subparagraph (F). This subparagraph (X) is 11        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;12            (Y) For taxable years ending on or after December 13        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 14        add back any insurance premiums under Section 15        203(c)(2)(G-14), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 16        that part of a reimbursement received from the 17        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 18        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 19        company) that would have been taken into account as a 20        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 21        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 22        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 23        (Y), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 24        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 25        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (Y). This 26        subparagraph (Y) is exempt from the provisions of   HB3117- 81 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        Section 250;2            (Z) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 3        2018 and before January 1, 2026, the amount of excess 4        business loss of the taxpayer disallowed as a 5        deduction by Section 461(l)(1)(B) of the Internal 6        Revenue Code; and 7            (AA) For taxable years beginning on or after 8        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 9        operating in this State and licensed under the 10        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 11        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 12        organization operating in this State and licensed 13        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 14        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 15        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 16        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 17        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 18        this subparagraph (AA) are exempt from the provisions 19        of Section 250; and . 20            (BB) For taxable years beginning on or after 21        January 1, 2024, an amount equal to the capital gains 22        realized by the taxpayer from the taking of property 23        by eminent domain to the extent that those gains are 24        included in the taxpayer's federal taxable income; 25        this subparagraph (AA) is exempt from the provisions 26        of Section 250.   HB3117- 82 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        (3) Limitation. The amount of any modification 2    otherwise required under this subsection shall, under 3    regulations prescribed by the Department, be adjusted by 4    any amounts included therein which were properly paid, 5    credited, or required to be distributed, or permanently 6    set aside for charitable purposes pursuant to Internal 7    Revenue Code Section 642(c) during the taxable year. 8    (d) Partnerships.9        (1) In general. In the case of a partnership, base 10    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 11    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).12        (2) Modifications. The taxable income referred to in 13    paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum 14    of the following amounts:15            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 16        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 17        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 18        in the computation of taxable income;19            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 20        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income for 21        the taxable year;22            (C) The amount of deductions allowed to the 23        partnership pursuant to Section 707 (c) of the 24        Internal Revenue Code in calculating its taxable 25        income;  HB3117- 83 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1            (D) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 2        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 3        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 4        computation of taxable income;5            (D-5) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 6        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 7        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 8        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 9        the Internal Revenue Code;10            (D-6) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 11        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 12        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 13        addition modification under subparagraph (D-5), then 14        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 15        deductions taken in all taxable years under 16        subparagraph (O) with respect to that property.17            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 18        the last day of the last tax year for which a 19        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 20        under subparagraph (O) and for which the taxpayer was 21        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 22        modification under subparagraph (O), then an amount 23        equal to that subtraction modification. 24            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 25        modification under this subparagraph only once with 26        respect to any one piece of property;  HB3117- 84 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1            (D-7) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 2        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 3        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 4        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 5        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 6        member of the same unitary business group but for the 7        fact the foreign person's business activity outside 8        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 9        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 10        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 11        who would be a member of the same unitary business 12        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 13        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 14        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 15        required to apportion business income under different 16        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 17        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 18        extent that dividends were included in base income of 19        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 20        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 21        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 22        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 23        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 24        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 25        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 26        the same person to whom the interest was paid,   HB3117- 85 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        accrued, or incurred. 2            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 3                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 4            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 5            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 6            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 7            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 8            with respect to such interest; or9                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 10            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 11            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 12            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 13            following:14                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 15                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 16                to a person that is not a related member, and17                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 18                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 19                person did not have as a principal purpose the 20                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 21                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 22                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 23                terms; or 24                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 25            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 26            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract   HB3117- 86 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 2            and terms and the principal purpose for the 3            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 4            or 5                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 6            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 7            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 8            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 9            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 10            to the application or use of an alternative method 11            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 12                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 13            Director from making any other adjustment 14            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 15            for any tax year beginning after the effective 16            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 17            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 18            Department and such regulations provide methods 19            and standards by which the Department will utilize 20            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; and 21            (D-8) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 22        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 23        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 24        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 25        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 26        foreign person who would be a member of the same   HB3117- 87 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        unitary business group but for the fact that the 2        foreign person's business activity outside the United 3        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 4        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 5        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 6        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 7        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 8        from being included in the unitary business group 9        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 10        business income under different subsections of Section 11        304. The addition modification required by this 12        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 13        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 14        group for the same taxable year and received by the 15        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 16        business group (including amounts included in gross 17        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 18        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 19        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 20        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 21        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 22        indirectly paid, incurred or accrued. The preceding 23        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 24        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 25        modification required under Section 203(d)(2)(D-7) of 26        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term   HB3117- 88 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 2        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 3        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 4        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 5        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 6        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 7        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 8        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 9        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 10        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 11        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 12        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 13        similar types of intangible assets;14            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:15                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 16            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 17            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 18            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 19            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 20            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 21            with respect to such item; or22                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 23            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 24            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 25            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 26            following:  HB3117- 89 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1                    (a) the person during the same taxable 2                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 3                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 4                not a related member, and5                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 6                intangible expense or cost between the 7                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 8                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 9                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 10                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 11                or12                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 13            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 14            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 15            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 16            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 17            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 18            writing to the application or use of an 19            alternative method of apportionment under Section 20            304(f); 21                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 22            Director from making any other adjustment 23            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 24            for any tax year beginning after the effective 25            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 26            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the   HB3117- 90 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1            Department and such regulations provide methods 2            and standards by which the Department will utilize 3            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 4            (D-9) For taxable years ending on or after 5        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 6        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 7        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 8        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 9        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 10        business group but for the fact that the person is 11        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 12        included in the unitary business group because he or 13        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 14        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 15        addition modification required by this subparagraph 16        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 17        included in base income of the unitary group for the 18        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 19        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 20        (including amounts included in gross income under 21        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 22        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 23        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 24        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 25        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 26        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the   HB3117- 91 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 2        the addition modification required under Section 3        203(d)(2)(D-7) or Section 203(d)(2)(D-8) of this Act;4            (D-10) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 5        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 6        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 7        Act;8            (D-11) For taxable years ending on or after 9        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 10        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 11        for the taxable year; 12            (D-12) the amount that is claimed as a federal 13        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 14        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 15        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 16        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 17        Tax Credit Act; 18    and by deducting from the total so obtained the following 19    amounts:20            (E) The valuation limitation amount;21            (F) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 22        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 23        and included in such total for the taxable year;24            (G) An amount equal to all amounts included in 25        taxable income as modified by subparagraphs (A), (B), 26        (C) and (D) which are exempt from taxation by this   HB3117- 92 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 2        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 3        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 4        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 5        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 6        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 7        net of bond premium amortization;8            (H) Any income of the partnership which 9        constitutes personal service income as defined in 10        Section 1348(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code (as in 11        effect December 31, 1981) or a reasonable allowance 12        for compensation paid or accrued for services rendered 13        by partners to the partnership, whichever is greater; 14        this subparagraph (H) is exempt from the provisions of 15        Section 250;16            (I) An amount equal to all amounts of income 17        distributable to an entity subject to the Personal 18        Property Tax Replacement Income Tax imposed by 19        subsections (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this Act 20        including amounts distributable to organizations 21        exempt from federal income tax by reason of Section 22        501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code; this subparagraph 23        (I) is exempt from the provisions of Section 250;24            (J) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 25        under subparagraph (G), an amount equal to the sum of 26        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections   HB3117- 93 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 2        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 3        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 4        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 5        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 6        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 7        Internal Revenue Code, plus, (iii) for taxable years 8        ending on or after December 31, 2011, Section 9        45G(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and, for 10        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, 11        any amount included in gross income under Section 87 12        of the Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 13        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 14        250;15            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 16        such total which were paid by a corporation which 17        conducts business operations in a River Edge 18        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 19        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 20        all of its operations from a River Edge Redevelopment 21        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (K) is exempt from 22        the provisions of Section 250;23            (L) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 24        job training project established pursuant to the Real 25        Property Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;26            (M) An amount equal to those dividends included in   HB3117- 94 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        such total that were paid by a corporation that 2        conducts business operations in a federally designated 3        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 4        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 5        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 6        subparagraph (K) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 7        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 8        this subparagraph (M);9            (N) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 10        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 11        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 12        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 13        the Internal Revenue Code;14            (O) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 15        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 16        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 17        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 18        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 19        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:20                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 21            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 22            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 23            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 24            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 25            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 26            including the bonus depreciation deduction;  HB3117- 95 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 2            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 3            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 4            0.429); and5                (3) for taxable years ending after December 6            31, 2005:7                    (i) for property on which a bonus 8                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 9                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 10                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 11                by 0.429);12                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 13                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 14                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 15                1.0;16                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 17                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 18                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 19                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 20                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 21                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 22                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 23                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 24                depreciation on that property; and25                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 26                depreciation deduction of a percentage other   HB3117- 96 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 2                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 3                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 4                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 5                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 6                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 7                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 8                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 9            The aggregate amount deducted under this 10        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 11        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 12        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 13        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 14        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 15        subparagraph (O) is exempt from the provisions of 16        Section 250;17            (P) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 18        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 19        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 20        modification under subparagraph (D-5), then an amount 21        equal to that addition modification.22            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 23        the last day of the last tax year for which a 24        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 25        under subparagraph (O) and for which the taxpayer was 26        required in any taxable year to make an addition   HB3117- 97 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        modification under subparagraph (D-5), then an amount 2        equal to that addition modification. 3            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 4        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 5        one piece of property.6            This subparagraph (P) is exempt from the 7        provisions of Section 250;8            (Q) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 9        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 10        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 11        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 12        modification with respect to such transaction under 13        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 14        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 15        the amount of such addition modification and (ii) any 16        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 17        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 18        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 19        that is required to make an addition modification with 20        respect to such transaction under Section 21        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 22        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 23        addition modification. This subparagraph (Q) is exempt 24        from Section 250; 25            (R) An amount equal to the interest income taken 26        into account for the taxable year (net of the   HB3117- 98 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 2        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 3        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 4        for the fact that the foreign person's business 5        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 6        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 7        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 8        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 9        business group but for the fact that the person is 10        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 11        included in the unitary business group because he or 12        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 13        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 14        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 15        made for the same taxable year under Section 16        203(d)(2)(D-7) for interest paid, accrued, or 17        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 18        This subparagraph (R) is exempt from Section 250; 19            (S) An amount equal to the income from intangible 20        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 21        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 22        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 23        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 24        for the fact that the foreign person's business 25        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 26        that person's total business activity and (ii) for   HB3117- 99 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 2        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 3        business group but for the fact that the person is 4        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 5        included in the unitary business group because he or 6        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 7        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 8        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 9        made for the same taxable year under Section 10        203(d)(2)(D-8) for intangible expenses and costs paid, 11        accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to the 12        same person. This subparagraph (S) is exempt from 13        Section 250; 14            (T) For taxable years ending on or after December 15        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 16        add back any insurance premiums under Section 17        203(d)(2)(D-9), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 18        that part of a reimbursement received from the 19        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 20        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 21        company) that would have been taken into account as a 22        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 23        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 24        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 25        (T), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 26        add back to income the amount subtracted by the   HB3117- 100 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (T). This 2        subparagraph (T) is exempt from the provisions of 3        Section 250; and 4            (U) For taxable years beginning on or after 5        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 6        operating in this State and licensed under the 7        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 8        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 9        organization operating in this State and licensed 10        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 11        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 12        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 13        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 14        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 15        this subparagraph (U) are exempt from the provisions 16        of Section 250; and . 17            (V) For taxable years beginning on or after 18        January 1, 2024, an amount equal to the capital gains 19        realized by the taxpayer from the taking of property 20        by eminent domain to the extent that those gains are 21        included in the taxpayer's federal taxable income; 22        this subparagraph (U) is exempt from the provisions of 23        Section 250.  24    (e) Gross income; adjusted gross income; taxable income.25        (1) In general. Subject to the provisions of paragraph   HB3117- 101 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1    (2) and subsection (b)(3), for purposes of this Section 2    and Section 803(e), a taxpayer's gross income, adjusted 3    gross income, or taxable income for the taxable year shall 4    mean the amount of gross income, adjusted gross income or 5    taxable income properly reportable for federal income tax 6    purposes for the taxable year under the provisions of the 7    Internal Revenue Code. Taxable income may be less than 8    zero. However, for taxable years ending on or after 9    December 31, 1986, net operating loss carryforwards from 10    taxable years ending prior to December 31, 1986, may not 11    exceed the sum of federal taxable income for the taxable 12    year before net operating loss deduction, plus the excess 13    of addition modifications over subtraction modifications 14    for the taxable year. For taxable years ending prior to 15    December 31, 1986, taxable income may never be an amount 16    in excess of the net operating loss for the taxable year as 17    defined in subsections (c) and (d) of Section 172 of the 18    Internal Revenue Code, provided that when taxable income 19    of a corporation (other than a Subchapter S corporation), 20    trust, or estate is less than zero and addition 21    modifications, other than those provided by subparagraph 22    (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) for corporations or 23    subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) for 24    trusts and estates, exceed subtraction modifications, an 25    addition modification must be made under those 26    subparagraphs for any other taxable year to which the   HB3117- 102 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1    taxable income less than zero (net operating loss) is 2    applied under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code or 3    under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 4    (e) applied in conjunction with Section 172 of the 5    Internal Revenue Code.6        (2) Special rule. For purposes of paragraph (1) of 7    this subsection, the taxable income properly reportable 8    for federal income tax purposes shall mean:9            (A) Certain life insurance companies. In the case 10        of a life insurance company subject to the tax imposed 11        by Section 801 of the Internal Revenue Code, life 12        insurance company taxable income, plus the amount of 13        distribution from pre-1984 policyholder surplus 14        accounts as calculated under Section 815a of the 15        Internal Revenue Code;16            (B) Certain other insurance companies. In the case 17        of mutual insurance companies subject to the tax 18        imposed by Section 831 of the Internal Revenue Code, 19        insurance company taxable income;20            (C) Regulated investment companies. In the case of 21        a regulated investment company subject to the tax 22        imposed by Section 852 of the Internal Revenue Code, 23        investment company taxable income;24            (D) Real estate investment trusts. In the case of 25        a real estate investment trust subject to the tax 26        imposed by Section 857 of the Internal Revenue Code,   HB3117- 103 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        real estate investment trust taxable income;2            (E) Consolidated corporations. In the case of a 3        corporation which is a member of an affiliated group 4        of corporations filing a consolidated income tax 5        return for the taxable year for federal income tax 6        purposes, taxable income determined as if such 7        corporation had filed a separate return for federal 8        income tax purposes for the taxable year and each 9        preceding taxable year for which it was a member of an 10        affiliated group. For purposes of this subparagraph, 11        the taxpayer's separate taxable income shall be 12        determined as if the election provided by Section 13        243(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code had been in 14        effect for all such years;15            (F) Cooperatives. In the case of a cooperative 16        corporation or association, the taxable income of such 17        organization determined in accordance with the 18        provisions of Section 1381 through 1388 of the 19        Internal Revenue Code, but without regard to the 20        prohibition against offsetting losses from patronage 21        activities against income from nonpatronage 22        activities; except that a cooperative corporation or 23        association may make an election to follow its federal 24        income tax treatment of patronage losses and 25        nonpatronage losses. In the event such election is 26        made, such losses shall be computed and carried over   HB3117- 104 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        in a manner consistent with subsection (a) of Section 2        207 of this Act and apportioned by the apportionment 3        factor reported by the cooperative on its Illinois 4        income tax return filed for the taxable year in which 5        the losses are incurred. The election shall be 6        effective for all taxable years with original returns 7        due on or after the date of the election. In addition, 8        the cooperative may file an amended return or returns, 9        as allowed under this Act, to provide that the 10        election shall be effective for losses incurred or 11        carried forward for taxable years occurring prior to 12        the date of the election. Once made, the election may 13        only be revoked upon approval of the Director. The 14        Department shall adopt rules setting forth 15        requirements for documenting the elections and any 16        resulting Illinois net loss and the standards to be 17        used by the Director in evaluating requests to revoke 18        elections. Public Act 96-932 is declaratory of 19        existing law; 20            (G) Subchapter S corporations. In the case of: (i) 21        a Subchapter S corporation for which there is in 22        effect an election for the taxable year under Section 23        1362 of the Internal Revenue Code, the taxable income 24        of such corporation determined in accordance with 25        Section 1363(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, except 26        that taxable income shall take into account those   HB3117- 105 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        items which are required by Section 1363(b)(1) of the 2        Internal Revenue Code to be separately stated; and 3        (ii) a Subchapter S corporation for which there is in 4        effect a federal election to opt out of the provisions 5        of the Subchapter S Revision Act of 1982 and have 6        applied instead the prior federal Subchapter S rules 7        as in effect on July 1, 1982, the taxable income of 8        such corporation determined in accordance with the 9        federal Subchapter S rules as in effect on July 1, 10        1982; and11            (H) Partnerships. In the case of a partnership, 12        taxable income determined in accordance with Section 13        703 of the Internal Revenue Code, except that taxable 14        income shall take into account those items which are 15        required by Section 703(a)(1) to be separately stated 16        but which would be taken into account by an individual 17        in calculating his taxable income.18        (3) Recapture of business expenses on disposition of 19    asset or business. Notwithstanding any other law to the 20    contrary, if in prior years income from an asset or 21    business has been classified as business income and in a 22    later year is demonstrated to be non-business income, then 23    all expenses, without limitation, deducted in such later 24    year and in the 2 immediately preceding taxable years 25    related to that asset or business that generated the 26    non-business income shall be added back and recaptured as   HB3117- 106 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1    business income in the year of the disposition of the 2    asset or business. Such amount shall be apportioned to 3    Illinois using the greater of the apportionment fraction 4    computed for the business under Section 304 of this Act 5    for the taxable year or the average of the apportionment 6    fractions computed for the business under Section 304 of 7    this Act for the taxable year and for the 2 immediately 8    preceding taxable years.  9    (f) Valuation limitation amount.10        (1) In general. The valuation limitation amount 11    referred to in subsections (a)(2)(G), (c)(2)(I) and 12    (d)(2)(E) is an amount equal to:13            (A) The sum of the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 14        amounts (to the extent consisting of gain reportable 15        under the provisions of Section 1245 or 1250 of the 16        Internal Revenue Code) for all property in respect of 17        which such gain was reported for the taxable year; 18        plus19            (B) The lesser of (i) the sum of the pre-August 1, 20        1969 appreciation amounts (to the extent consisting of 21        capital gain) for all property in respect of which 22        such gain was reported for federal income tax purposes 23        for the taxable year, or (ii) the net capital gain for 24        the taxable year, reduced in either case by any amount 25        of such gain included in the amount determined under   HB3117- 107 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        subsection (a)(2)(F) or (c)(2)(H).2        (2) Pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation amount.3            (A) If the fair market value of property referred 4        to in paragraph (1) was readily ascertainable on 5        August 1, 1969, the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 6        amount for such property is the lesser of (i) the 7        excess of such fair market value over the taxpayer's 8        basis (for determining gain) for such property on that 9        date (determined under the Internal Revenue Code as in 10        effect on that date), or (ii) the total gain realized 11        and reportable for federal income tax purposes in 12        respect of the sale, exchange or other disposition of 13        such property.14            (B) If the fair market value of property referred 15        to in paragraph (1) was not readily ascertainable on 16        August 1, 1969, the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 17        amount for such property is that amount which bears 18        the same ratio to the total gain reported in respect of 19        the property for federal income tax purposes for the 20        taxable year, as the number of full calendar months in 21        that part of the taxpayer's holding period for the 22        property ending July 31, 1969 bears to the number of 23        full calendar months in the taxpayer's entire holding 24        period for the property.25            (C) The Department shall prescribe such 26        regulations as may be necessary to carry out the   HB3117- 108 -LRB104 10027 HLH 20098 b1        purposes of this paragraph. 2    (g) Double deductions. Unless specifically provided 3otherwise, nothing in this Section shall permit the same item 4to be deducted more than once. 5    (h) Legislative intention. Except as expressly provided by 6this Section there shall be no modifications or limitations on 7the amounts of income, gain, loss or deduction taken into 8account in determining gross income, adjusted gross income or 9taxable income for federal income tax purposes for the taxable 10year, or in the amount of such items entering into the 11computation of base income and net income under this Act for 12such taxable year, whether in respect of property values as of 13August 1, 1969 or otherwise.14(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 15102-658, eff. 8-27-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1112, eff. 1612-21-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-478, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, 17Article 10, Section 10-900, eff. 6-7-24; 103-592, Article 170, 18Section 170-90, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-647, 19eff. 7-1-24; revised 8-20-24.) 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.